Washington statutes.
RCW 41.40.630

Retirement for service.

(1) NORMAL RETIREMENT. Any member with at least five service credit years who has attained at least age sixty-five shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.40.620.

(2) EARLY RETIREMENT. Any member who has completed at least twenty service credit years and has attained age fifty-five shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.40.620, except that a member retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the retirement allowance actuarially reduced to reflect the difference in the number of years between age at retirement and the attainment of age sixty-five.

(3) ALTERNATE EARLY RETIREMENT.

(a) Any member who has completed at least thirty service credit years and has attained age fifty-five shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.40.620, except that a member retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the retirement allowance reduced by three percent per year to reflect the difference in the number of years between age at retirement and the attainment of age sixty-five.

(b)(i) On or after July 1, 2008, any member who has completed at least thirty service credit years and has attained age fifty-five shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.40.620, except that a member retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the retirement allowance reduced as follows:

Retirement

Age

Percent

Reduction

55

20%

56

17%

57

14%

58

11%

59

8%

60

5%

61

2%

62

0%

63

0%

64

0%

(ii) Any member who retired on or after September 1, 2008, and chose the three percent per year reduction provided under (a) of this subsection shall have a retirement allowance recalculated under the reductions of (b)(i) of this subsection for benefit payments made on or after January 1, 2024.

(c) Members who first become employed by an employer in an eligible position on or after May 1, 2013, are not eligible for the alternate early retirement provisions of (a) or (b) of this subsection. Any member who first becomes employed by an employer in an eligible position on or after May 1, 2013, and has completed at least thirty service credit years and has attained age fifty-five shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.40.620, except that a member retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the retirement allowance reduced by five percent per year to reflect the difference in the number of years between age at retirement and the attainment of age sixty-five.

[ 2023 c 410 s 9; 2012 1st sp.s. c 7 s 5; 2007 c 491 s 9; 2000 c 247 s 901; 1991 c 343 s 11; 1977 ex.s. c 295 s 4.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2023 c 410: See notes following RCW 41.32.765.

Benefits not contractual right until July 1, 2008—2007 c 491: "The new benefits provided pursuant to sections 9(3)(b) and 10(3)(b), chapter 491, Laws of 2007 are not provided to employees as a matter of contractual right prior to July 1, 2008, and will not become a contractual right thereafter if the repeal of chapter 41.31A RCW is held to be invalid in a final determination of a court of law. The legislature retains the right to alter or abolish these benefits at any time prior to July 1, 2008." [ 2007 c 491 s 16.]

Severability—Conflict with federal requirements—2007 c 491: See notes following RCW 41.32.765.

Findings—Effective dates—1991 c 343: See notes following RCW 41.50.005.

Legislative direction and placement—Section headings—1977 ex.s. c 295: See notes following RCW 41.40.610.